src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.aff
SFX   estar  stame estar
SFX   estar  stanos estar
SFX   etar  tame etar
SFX   etar  tanos etar
SFX   eter  teme eter
SFX   eter  tenos eter
SFX   evar  vame evar
SFX   evar  vanos evar
SFX   ibir  beme ibir
SFX   ibir  benos ibir
SFX   icar  came icar
SFX   icar  canos icar
SFX   iciar  ciame iciar
SFX   iciar  cianos iciar
SFX   idar  dame idar
SFX   idar  danos idar
SFX   igar  game igar
SFX   igar  ganos igar
SFX   irar  rame irar
SFX   irar  ranos irar
SFX   isar  same isar
SFX   isar  sanos isar
SFX   itar  tame itar
SFX   itar  tanos itar
SFX   iviar  viame iviar
SFX   iviar  vianos iviar
SFX   obrar  brame obrar
SFX   obrar  branos obrar
SFX   ocar  came ocar
SFX   ocar  canos ocar
SFX   oger  geme oger
SFX   oger  genos oger
SFX   ojar  jame ojar
SFX   ojar  janos ojar
SFX   omar  mame omar
SFX   omar  manos omar
SFX   omer  meme omer
SFX   omer  menos omer
SFX   omprar  mprame omprar
SFX   omprar  mpranos omprar
SFX   onar  name onar
SFX   onar  nanos onar
SFX   oplar  plame oplar
SFX   oplar  planos oplar
SFX   orar  rame orar
SFX   orar  ranos orar
SFX   orrar  rrame orrar
SFX   orrar  rranos orrar
SFX   orrer  rreme orrer
SFX   orrer  rrenos orrer
SFX   otar  tame otar
SFX   otar  tanos otar
SFX   ubir  beme ubir
SFX   ubir  benos ubir
SFX   ucar  came ucar
SFX   ucar  canos ucar
SFX   uchar  chame uchar
SFX   uchar  chanos uchar
SFX   udar  dame udar
SFX   udar  danos udar
SFX   ujar  jame ujar
SFX   ujar  janos ujar
SFX   ullar  llame ullar
SFX   ullar  llanos ullar
SFX   ulpar  lpame ulpar
SFX   ulpar  lpanos ulpar
SFX   ultar  ltame ultar
SFX   ultar  ltanos ultar
SFX   unciar  nciame unciar
SFX   unciar  ncianos unciar
SFX   untar  ntame untar
SFX   untar  ntanos untar
SFX   upar  pame upar
SFX   upar  panos upar
SFX   urar  rame urar
SFX   urar  ranos urar
SFX   urgar  rgame urgar
SFX   urgar  rganos urgar
SFX   usar  same usar
SFX   usar  sanos usar
SFX   uscar  scame uscar
SFX   uscar  scanos uscar

SFX   Y 84
SFX   abar  bale abar
SFX   abar  bales abar
SFX   r dle r
SFX   r dles r
SFX   ablar  blale ablar
SFX   ablar  blales ablar
SFX   acar  cale acar
SFX   acar  cales acar
SFX   adir  dele adir
SFX   adir  deles adir
SFX   ajar  jale ajar
SFX   ajar  jales ajar
SFX   ambiar  mbiale ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiales ambiar
SFX   antar  ntale antar
SFX   antar  ntales antar
SFX   apar  pale apar
SFX   apar  pales apar
SFX   arir  rele arir
SFX   arir  reles arir
SFX   arrar  rrale arrar
SFX   arrar  rrales arrar
SFX   egar  gale egar
SFX   egar  gales egar
SFX   eglar  glale eglar
SFX   eglar  glales eglar
SFX   ejar  jale ejar
SFX   ejar  jales ejar
SFX   entar  ntale entar
SFX   entar  ntales entar
SFX   e ar   ale e ar
SFX   e ar   ales e ar
SFX   erar  rale erar
SFX   erar  rales erar
SFX   ercar  rcale ercar
SFX   ercar  rcales ercar
SFX   estar  stale estar
SFX   estar  stales estar
SFX   eter  tele eter
SFX   eter  teles eter
SFX   evar  vale evar
SFX   evar  vales evar
SFX   icar  cale icar
SFX   icar  cales icar
SFX   iciar  ciale iciar
SFX   iciar  ciales iciar
SFX   igir  gele igir
SFX   igir  geles igir
SFX   imar  male imar
SFX   imar  males imar
SFX   ingar  ngale ingar
SFX   ingar  ngales ingar
SFX   irar  rale irar
SFX   irar  rales irar
SFX   irmar  rmale irmar
SFX   irmar  rmales irmar
SFX   isar  sale isar
SFX   isar  sales isar
SFX   istar  stale istar
SFX   istar  stales istar
SFX   izar  zale izar
SFX   izar  zales izar
SFX   ocar  cale ocar
SFX   ocar  cales ocar
SFX   onar  nale onar
SFX   onar  nales onar
SFX   onder  ndele onder
SFX   onder  ndeles onder
SFX   orar  rale orar
SFX   orar  rales orar
SFX   uchar  chales uchar
SFX   uchar  chale uchar
SFX   udar  dales udar
SFX   udar  dale udar
SFX   ultar  ltales ultar
SFX   ultar  ltale ultar
SFX   umir  meles umir
SFX   umir  mele umir
SFX   unciar  nciales unciar
SFX   unciar  nciale unciar
SFX   untar  ntales untar
SFX   untar  ntale untar
SFX   uscar  scales uscar
SFX   uscar  scale uscar

SFX   Y 264
SFX   adir  demela adir
SFX   adir  demelas adir
SFX   adir  demelo adir
SFX   adir  demelos adir
SFX   adir  denosla adir
SFX   adir  denoslas adir
SFX   adir  denoslo adir
SFX   adir  denoslos adir
SFX   adir  desela adir
SFX   adir  deselas adir
SFX   adir  deselo adir
SFX   adir  deselos adir
SFX   ir  dmela ir
SFX   ir  dmelas ir
SFX   ir  dmelo ir
SFX   ir  dmelos ir
SFX   ir  dnosla ir
SFX   ir  dnoslas ir
SFX   ir  dnoslo ir
SFX   ir  dnoslos ir
SFX   ir  dsela ir
SFX   ir  dselas ir
SFX   ir  dselo ir
SFX   ir  dselos ir
SFX   ambiar  mbiamela ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiamelas ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiamelo ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiamelos ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbianosla ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbianoslas ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbianoslo ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbianoslos ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiasela ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiaselas ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiaselo ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbiaselos ambiar
SFX   ar  dmela ar
SFX   ar  dmelas ar
SFX   ar  dmelo ar
SFX   ar  dmelos ar
SFX   ar  dnosla ar
SFX   ar  dnoslas ar
SFX   ar  dnoslo ar
SFX   ar  dnoslos ar
SFX   ar  dsela ar
SFX   ar  dselas ar
SFX   ar  dselo ar
SFX   ar  dselos ar
SFX   ancar  ncamela ancar
SFX   ancar  ncamelas ancar
SFX   ancar  ncamelo ancar
SFX   ancar  ncamelos ancar
SFX   ancar  ncanosla ancar
SFX   ancar  ncanoslas ancar
SFX   ancar  ncanoslo ancar
SFX   ancar  ncanoslos ancar
SFX   ancar  ncasela ancar
SFX   ancar  ncaselas ancar
SFX   ancar  ncaselo ancar
SFX   ancar  ncaselos ancar
SFX   antar  ntamela antar
SFX   antar  ntamelas antar
SFX   antar  ntamelo antar
SFX   antar  ntamelos antar
SFX   antar  ntanosla antar
SFX   antar  ntanoslas antar
SFX   antar  ntanoslo antar
SFX   antar  ntanoslos antar
SFX   antar  ntasela antar
SFX   antar  ntaselas antar
SFX   antar  ntaselo antar
SFX   antar  ntaselos antar
SFX   anzar  nzamela anzar
SFX   anzar  nzamelas anzar
SFX   anzar  nzamelo anzar
SFX   anzar  nzamelos anzar
SFX   anzar  nzanosla anzar
SFX   anzar  nzanoslas anzar
SFX   anzar  nzanoslo anzar
SFX   anzar  nzanoslos anzar
SFX   anzar  nzasela anzar
SFX   anzar  nzaselas anzar
SFX   anzar  nzaselo anzar
SFX   anzar  nzaselos anzar
SFX   asar  samela asar
SFX   asar  samelas asar
SFX   asar  samelo asar
SFX   asar  samelos asar
SFX   asar  sanosla asar
SFX   asar  sanoslas asar
SFX   asar  sanoslo asar
SFX   asar  sanoslos asar
SFX   asar  sasela asar
SFX   asar  saselas asar
SFX   asar  saselo asar
SFX   asar  saselos asar
SFX   ear  amela ear
SFX   ear  amelas ear
SFX   ear  amelo ear
SFX   ear  amelos ear
SFX   ear  anosla ear
SFX   ear  anoslas ear
SFX   ear  anoslo ear
SFX   ear  anoslos ear
SFX   ear  asela ear
SFX   ear  aselas ear
SFX   ear  aselo ear
SFX   ear  aselos ear
SFX   eder  demela eder
SFX   eder  demelas eder
SFX   eder  demelo eder
SFX   eder  demelos eder
SFX   eder  denosla eder
SFX   eder  denoslas eder
SFX   eder  denoslo eder
SFX   eder  denoslos eder
SFX   eder  desela eder
SFX   eder  deselas eder
SFX   eder  deselo eder
SFX   eder  deselos eder
SFX   er  dmela er
SFX   er  dmelas er
SFX   er  dmelo er
SFX   er  dmelos er
SFX   er  dnosla er
SFX   er  dnoslas er
SFX   er  dnoslo er
SFX   er  dnoslos er
SFX   er  dsela er
SFX   er  dselas er
SFX   er  dselo er
SFX   er  dselos er
SFX   eer  emela eer
SFX   eer  emelas eer
SFX   eer  emelo eer
SFX   eer  emelos eer
SFX   eer  enosla eer
SFX   eer  enoslas eer
SFX   eer  enoslo eer
SFX   eer  enoslos eer
SFX   eer  esela eer
SFX   eer  eselas eer
SFX   eer  eselo eer
SFX   eer  eselos eer
SFX   egar  gamela egar
SFX   egar  gamelas egar
SFX   egar  gamelo egar
SFX   egar  gamelos egar
SFX   egar  ganosla egar
SFX   egar  ganoslas egar
SFX   egar  ganoslo egar
SFX   egar  ganoslos egar
SFX   egar  gasela egar
SFX   egar  gaselas egar
SFX   egar  gaselo egar
SFX   egar  gaselos egar
SFX   ejar  jamela ejar
SFX   ejar  jamelas ejar
SFX   ejar  jamelo ejar
SFX   ejar  jamelos ejar
SFX   ejar  janosla ejar
SFX   ejar  janoslas ejar
SFX   ejar  janoslo ejar
SFX   ejar  janoslos ejar
SFX   ejar  jasela ejar
