src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
abundancia/rS
abundar/rRtED
abund /tr
aguad/rhi
aguan/rhi
agudo/SGr
ag e/rSih
agu /rih
alce/rSp
aliment bamos/r
alimentaba/rS
aliment is/r
alimentan/r
alimentarais/r
alimentar n/r
alimentar s/r
alimentar is/r
alimentaren/r
alimentar ais/r
alimentar an/r
alimentarse/r
alimentasen/r
alimentas/rS
alimentemos/r
alimente/rGS
aliment /r
alza/rp
alzo/rpG
a ada/r
a ad a/r
a ad /r
a ad s/r
aran/trp
arco/ri
aren/trp
aro/pr
asan/r
asar/rRD
aso/r
barramos/r
barred/r
barren/irh
barrer s/r
barreremos/r
barrer amos/r
barrerse/r
barr ais/r
barrida/r
barri ndose/r
barri ramos/r
barriereis/r
barriere/rSG
barrieseis/r
barriese/rS
barr /r
barriste/r
bebed/irh
beber/hRiErD
bebi /hri
bebo/iLhr
calentamiento/rS
cara/rSahil
cargaba/hSpr
cargabais/rh
cargad/hGipr
cargado/hSpr
cargamos/hpr
carg ndose/r
cargara/hpr
cargarais/rh
cargar n/rph
cargar /rph
cargar s/rph
cargar is/rh
cargaremos/r
cargaren/hpr
cargar ais/r
cargar an/rh
cargar a/rSph
cargaron/hpr
cargarse/hpr
cargase/hpr
cargasen/hpr
cargas/hSpr
cargasteis/r
cargu /hrpi
cargu is/prh
carguemos/rh
cejo/pjfr
celestial/rS
cenad/r
cenar/RrDE
cene/GSr
cen /r
cen /r
cerrada/r
cerrado/rihSjG
cog is/rjbih
cogemos/irbjh
coger s/ihjbr
coger is/brj
cogeremos/jrb
coger ais/rjb
coger an/brj
cogerle/rS
cogeros/ri
cogerte/ri
cog a/brSjihap
cog /brijahp
cogida/ihbjr
cogi ndose/jr
cogi ramos/jr
cogiera/rhbji
cogiereis/brj
cogieron/bjr
cogi semos/rj
cogiesen/bjr
cogi /bihjarp
cogisteis/brj
coja/bphajir
cojan/bprajhi
comidas/r
copas/r
crec is/r
crecemos/r
crecen/hpgar
crecer s/r
crecer is/r
crecer /r
crecer amos/r
crecer a/rS
crecerse/r
crec an/r
crec a/rSagph
crecida/r
creci ndose/r
crecierais/r
crecieran/r
creciereis/r
crecieren/r
creciere/rGS
creciesen/r
creciese/rS
crec /hagpr
crecisteis/r
creciste/r
crezc is/r
crezcan/r
crezco/hpgarG
cruces/r
cuello/Shr
curan/rop
cura/opr
curen/rop
cur /rpo
cure/rSGop
dicha/phfnlrbj
diente/riSh
doraba/hSrp
dor bamos/r
doraban/hrp
dorad/hGpra
doramos/hrp
dorando/hrp
dor ndose/r
dora/pahr
dorar /hpr
dor ramos/r
dorar n/prh
dorara/rph
dorar s/prh
dorare/hSGrp
dorar is/rh
doraremos/r
doraren/hrp
dorar ais/r
dorar amos/r
doraron/hrp
dorarse/hrp
doraseis/rh
dorasen/hrp
dorase/rph
doraste/hrp
doremos/hrp
doren/prah
dore/pGSrah
doro/pahr
dor /rhap
entended/thrs
entendi /tsrh
entend /rhst
entienda/trhs
excedan/r
exceded/r
exceden/r
excede/rSG
exced a/r
excedi /r
excitad/r
excitan/r
excita/r
exciten/r
excit /r
excite/rGS
falda/irS
faz/crhSl
flores/r
gana/ahr
ganad/rha
ganar/hRrDaE
ganen/rha
gan /rha
gano/ahr
girad/r
gira/r
girar/RrDE
giren/r
gir /pr
gir /r
hilad/riahp
hilar/RpDrhia
hil /hirap
hueso/rS
humana/krS
humanos/r
impriman/rp
imprima/pr
imprimen/rp
imprim a/rp
imprimid/rp
imprim /rp
imprim s/rp
imprimo/pr
intendencia/rS
llave/rS
llenan/rp
llena/rp
llenen/rp
llen /pr
llene/SGrp
lleva/fr
llevan/fr
llevar/fRrED 
lleve/fSGr
lleven/fr
llevo/fr
mesana/rS
mesa/prSo
nadad/r
nadar/RrDE
nad /r
nade/rSG
natural/fSrck
naturalmente/rf
nombre/pbSnor
pasabais/ohr
pasaban/rpho
pasado/rShbGpo
pasando/rpho
pasan/orph
pasar n/ohpr
pasar s/ohpr
pasareis/rho
pasar /oprh
pasar amos/r
pasar a/ohpSr
pasarnos/ro
pasarse/rpho
pasaseis/hor
pasas/rSpho
pas is/oprh
pase/oGShpr
pelos/rp
pintaban/rph
pintado/prSh
pintamos/rph
pinta/phr
pint ramos/r
pintara/phr
pintaremos/r
pintaren/rph
pintar amos/r
pintaron/rph
pintaseis/hr
pintas/rSph
pint is/rhp
pinten/prh
pint /prh
poneros/koprl
pongo/ukgptalonbr
poni ndome/rk
primada/r
puesta/tkunopargilS
pujamiento/rS
pujar/pREriD
puj /irp
pujo/pri
sale/gSpr
salga/pr
salid/pr
sal s/rp
saltabais/r
saltado/rSp
saltamos/rp
salt ndonos/r
salt ndote/r
salt ramos/r
saltar /pr
saltar is/r
saltaren/rp
saltar ais/r
saltar a/rSp
saltaros/r
saltarte/r
saltasen/rp
saltaste/rp
saltemos/pr
salt /rap
sanan/psr
sanen/psr
sea/raS
sembr /rp
siembre/pr
sol /argsfk
suela/sgafr
suelen/sfrag
todos/r
venga/afongplrst
ven s/fatsrlgpno
vert /ksrpf
vest a/prkih
vest s/prkih
vienta/rpha
vierto/frpks
vistan/ajihrkp
vistes/ajihrkp
vivan/rpahf
vive/rSGhpaf
vivientes/r
viv s/fhpr
volad/rp
vuele/pr
